Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,112
Search warrant; return; form and contents.

Any officer executing a search warrant shall forthwith make his return thereon to the court or officer issuing such search warrant of the manner and date of his execution thereof, showing what, if anything, was seized and held by such search, together with the name of the owner or owners, if known, and shall attach to such return an accurate list or inventory of the articles and things so seized.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 80, p. 416;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-380;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,112.